Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 32.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20101-161
Certified public accountant; public
accountant; false use of partnership or limited liability company designation;
prohibition.

No person shall assume or use the title or designation certified public
accountant or public accountant in conjunction with names indicating or implying
that there is a partnership or a limited liability company or in conjunction
with the designation "and company" or "and Co." or a similar designation if,
in any such case, there is in fact no bona fide partnership or limited liability
company registered under section 1-126.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 56, p. 75;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 57;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 51;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 32.